Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.570

Action on bond by director—Authorized—Grounds.

The director may bring action upon the bond of a warehouse operator or grain dealer against both principal against whom a claim has been made and the surety in any court of competent jurisdiction to recover the damages caused by any failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted hereunder. Recovery for damages against a warehouse operator or grain dealer on a bond furnished under RCW 22.09.095 shall be limited to the bond amount that would be required for that warehouse operator or grain dealer under RCW 22.09.090.

[ 2011 c 336 s 636; 1987 c 509 s 5; 1983 c 305 s 56; 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 29.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 509: See note following RCW 22.09.060.

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.